Utah statutes.
17-36-31.   Tax levy -- Amount.

(1)  Before June 22 of each year, the county legislative body shall levy a tax on the taxable real and personal property within the county. In its computation of the total levy subject to Sections 59-2-908 and 59-2-911, it shall determine the requirements for each fund and specify the amount of the levy apportioned to each fund.

(2)  The proceeds of the tax apportioned for purposes of the General Fund shall be credited in the General Fund.

(3)  The proceeds of the tax apportioned for utility and other special fund purposes shall be credited to the appropriate accounts in the utility or other special funds.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

